Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.170

Student transportation allocation—District's reports to superintendent.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5009-S.SL) ***

Each district shall submit three times each year to the superintendent of public instruction during October, February, and May of each year a report containing the following:

(1)(a) The number of eligible students transported to and from school as provided for in RCW 28A.160.150, along with identification of stop locations and school locations, and (b) the number of miles driven for pupil transportation services as authorized in RCW 28A.160.150 the previous school year; and

(2) Other operational data and descriptions as required by the superintendent to determine allocation requirements for each district. The superintendent shall require that districts separate the costs of operating the program for the transportation of eligible students to and from school as defined by RCW 28A.160.160(3), non-to-and-from-school pupil transportation costs, and costs to provide expanded services under RCW 28A.160.185(1) in the annual financial statement. The cost, quantity, and type of all fuel purchased by school districts for use in to-and-from-school transportation shall be included in the annual financial statement.

Each district shall submit the information required in this section on a timely basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of school transportation moneys.

[ 2021 c 234 s 3; 2009 c 548 s 306; 2007 c 139 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 143; 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 4; 1981 c 265 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.41.515.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2021 c 234: See notes following RCW 28A.160.185.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 304-311: See note following RCW 28A.160.150.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Effective date—2007 c 139 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2007." [ 2007 c 139 s 3.]

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 61: See note following RCW 28A.160.010.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 265: See notes following RCW 28A.160.150.